Nevada, session 83, SB446.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 389.167 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.167 1. A pupil enrolled at a public school must be
allowed to apply one or more credits toward the total number of
credits required for graduation from high school if the pupil
successfully completes the number of hours in a work-based
learning program required by regulation of the State Board to earn
such credits. Any credits earned for successful completion of a
work-based learning program must be applied toward the pupil’s
elective course credits and not toward a course that is required for
graduation from high school.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may offer a work-based learning program
upon application to and with the approval of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction. An application to offer a work-based learning
program must include, without limitation:
(a) The fields, trades or occupations in which a work-based
learning program will be offered.
(b) The qualifications of a pupil to participate in the work-based
learning program. Such qualifications must allow a majority of
pupils who are least 16 years of age to be eligible to participate in
the work-based learning program.
(c) A description of the process that will be used by pupils to
apply to participate in a work-based learning program.
-
*SB446*

– 3 –
(d) A description of the manner in which participation in a
work-based learning program and completion of the requirements of
a work-based learning program will be verified.
(e) A description of the manner in which the performance of a
pupil who participates in the work-based learning program will be
evaluated, which must include, without limitation, an on-site
evaluation of the performance of the pupil.
3. Upon approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
of an application to offer a work-based learning program submitted
pursuant to subsection 2, the board of trustees or the governing body
shall:
(a) Designate an employee of the school district or charter
school, as applicable, to serve as a work-based learning coordinator
to coordinate and oversee work-based learning programs. Such an
employee must ensure that each business, agency or organization
that will offer employment and supervision of a pupil as part of the
work-based learning program is suitable for participation in a work-
based learning program.
(b) Establish and maintain a list of businesses, agencies and
organizations that have been found suitable by the work-based
learning coordinator pursuant to paragraph (a).
4. To receive approval from the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to offer a work-based learning program, the work-based
learning program must include, without limitation, requirements
that:
(a) A detailed training agreement and training plan be completed
for each pupil participating in the work-based learning program for
credit that identifies the specific tasks in which the pupil will
participate that will develop competency of the pupil in the
workplace;
(b) A pupil participating in the work-based learning program be
allowed to leave the public school in which he or she is enrolled
during the school day to participate in such a program;
(c) Participation by a pupil in the work-based learning program
will develop a broad range of skills and will allow a pupil to focus
on his or her chosen career pathway; and
(d) Training be completed by each pupil participating in the
work-based learning program on:
(1) Identifying and reporting harassment in the workplace;
(2) Developing and maintaining healthy relationships in the
workplace; and
(3) Identifying the signs of a person engaging in predatory
conduct to prepare a pupil for sexual activity or to foster an
inappropriate personal or professional relationship with a pupil,
including, without limitation, through communicating or attempting
-
*SB446*

– 4 –
to befriend or establish a relationship or other connection with a
parent or legal guardian of a pupil in furtherance of such conduct.
5. A school district or charter school may allow a pupil who
successfully completes a work-based learning program to earn dual
credit for participation in the work-based learning program.
6. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
board of trustees of a school district and the governing body of a
charter school that offers a work-based learning program shall
prepare a report concerning the manner in which the work-based
learning program has been carried out and submit the report to the
State Board and the Legislature. The report must include, without
limitation:
(a) The number of pupils participating in the work-based
learning program; and
(b) The types of work-based learning offered through the work-
based learning program.
7. The number of pupils participating in the work-based
learning program reported pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 6
must be disaggregated on the basis of the following characteristics:
(a) Pupils who are American Indian or Alaska Native, Asian,
Black or African American, Hispanic or Latino, Native Hawaiian or
Pacific Islander, white or two or more races;
(b) Gender of pupils;
(c) Pupils who are migrants; and
(d) Pupils who are members of special populations, as defined in
20 U.S.C. § 2302(48).
Sec. 2. NRS 391.1055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.1055 1. The Department shall prescribe by regulation a
method for the board of trustees of a school district to determine if a
business, agency or organization that is seeking to employ and
supervise a pupil as a part of a work-based learning program
pursuant to NRS 389.167 should be subject to the provisions of
NRS 391.104 requiring a volunteer who is likely to have
unsupervised contact with pupils to submit his or her fingerprints for
an investigation into the criminal background of the volunteer.
2. The method prescribed by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must include, without limitation, a process outlining
how the board of trustees of a school district shall:
(a) Examine a business, agency or organization seeking to
participate in a work-based learning program pursuant to NRS
389.167; and
(b) Determine if the employment and supervision of a pupil in
the work-based learning program by the business, agency or
organization examined pursuant to paragraph (a) would be
appropriate for the pupil.
-
*SB446*

– 5 –
3. If the board of trustees of a school district determines the
employment of a pupil in a work-based learning program pursuant
to this section is appropriate for the pupil pursuant to subsection 2,
the board of trustees may [exempt] :
(a) Exempt any [volunteers] volunteer employed by the
business, agency or organization from the requirements of NRS
391.104 requiring a volunteer who is likely to have unsupervised
contact with pupils to submit his or her fingerprints for an
investigation into the criminal background of the volunteer [.] if the
volunteer has passed an investigation into his or her criminal
background as a requirement for:
(1) Employment with the business, agency or organization;
or
(2) Obtaining a professional or occupational license in this
State; or
(b) Authorize the volunteer to submit his or her fingerprints
for an investigation into the criminal background of the volunteer
less often than every 5 years.
4. To the extent money is available, the board of trustees of a
school district may reimburse a business, agency or organization
for the cost incurred by the business, agency or organization for
submitting fingerprints for the investigation into the criminal
background of the volunteer.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
H
-
*SB446*